Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202285-2705
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Veteran and Active Duty Supportive Postsecondary Institution Act.

Laws 2019, LB486, § 5.